Washington statutes.
RCW 18.210.110

Experience from outside state.

Experience in on-site design, inspection, and/or construction activities acquired outside the state of Washington may satisfy the experience requirements under this chapter. The board shall consider the experience according to the level of complexity of the design work and evidence that the experience shows increased responsibility over designs. The experience may be considered only to the extent that it can be independently verified by the board.

[ 1999 c 263 s 12.]